en: Scanner Accessories
xx: Scanner Accessories
cs: Skenery – příslušenství
da: Scanner – tilbehør
de: Scannerzubehör
es: Accesorios para escáner
fr: Accessoires pour scanner
it: Accessori per scanner
ja: スキャナー関連用品
nl: Scanneraccessoires
no: Tilbehør til skannere
pl: Akcesoria do skanerów
pt: Acessórios para scanner
ru: Принадлежности для сканеров
sv: Skannertillbehör
tr: Tarayıcı Aksesuarları

en: Scanners
xx: Scanners
cs: Skenery
da: Scannere
de: Scanner
es: Escáneres
fr: Scanners
it: Scanner
ja: スキャナー
nl: Scanners
no: Skannere
pl: Skanery
pt: Scanners
ru: Сканеры
sv: Skannrar
tr: Tarayıcılar

en: Radar Detectors
xx: Radar Detectors
cs: Detektory radarů
da: Radardetektorer
de: Radarwarner
es: Detectores de radares
fr: Détecteurs de radars, Détecteur radar
it: Rilevatori di radar e autovelox
ja: レーダー探知機
nl: Radardetectoren
no: Radardetektorer
pl: Antyradary
pt: Detectores de radar
ru: Детекторы радаров
sv: Radardetektorer
tr: Radar Dedektörleri

en: Speed Radars
xx: Speed Radars
cs: Rychlostní radary
da: Hastighedsradarer
de: Radargeschwindigkeitsmesser
es: Radares de velocidad
fr: Radars de vitesse
it: Radar di velocità
ja: スピード ガン
nl: Snelheidsradars
no: Fartsmålere
pl: Radary do mierzenia prędkości
pt: Radares de velocidade
ru: Радары скорости
sv: Hastighetsradar
tr: Hız Radarları

en: Toll Collection Devices
xx: Toll Collection Devices
cs: Zařízení na výběr mýta
da: Opkrævningssystem
de: Geräte zur Mauterhebung
es: Dispositivos para el cobro de peajes
fr: Boîtiers de télépéage
it: Dispositivi pagamento pedaggio
ja: ETC車載器
nl: Verzamelapparaten voor tolgeld
no: Utstyr for innkreving av bompenger
pl: Urządzenia do pobierania opłat drogowych
pt: Dispositivos para cobrança de pedágio
ru: Устройства для взимания оплаты
sv: Enheter för vägtullbetalning
tr: Ücret Toplama Cihazları

en: Video
xx: Video
cs: Video
da: Video
de: Video
es: Vídeo
fr: Vidéo, Matériel vidéo
it: Video
ja: 映像
nl: Video
no: Video
pl: Wideo
pt: Vídeo
ru: Видеоаппаратура
sv: Video
tr: Video

en: Computer Monitors
xx: Computer Monitors
cs: Počítačové monitory
da: Computerskærme
de: Computermonitore
es: Monitores de ordenador
fr: Écrans d'ordinateur, Écran, Ecran
it: Monitor per computer
ja: PCモニター
nl: Computerbeeldschermen
no: Dataskjermer
pl: Monitory komputerowe
pt: Monitores de computador
ru: Компьютерные мониторы
sv: Datorskärmar
tr: Bilgisayar Monitörleri

en: Projectors
xx: Projectors
cs: Projektory
da: Projektorer
de: Projektoren
es: Proyectores
fr: Vidéoprojecteurs
it: Proiettori
ja: プロジェクター
nl: Projectoren
no: Prosjektører
pl: Projektory
pt: Projetores
ru: Проекторы
sv: Projektorer
tr: Projeksiyon Cihazları

en: Multimedia Projectors
xx: Multimedia Projectors
cs: Multimediální projektory
da: Multimedieprojektorer
de: Multimedia-Projektoren
es: Proyectores multimedia
fr: Projecteurs multimédias
it: Proiettori multimediali
ja: マルチメディアプロジェクター
nl: Multimediaprojectoren
no: Multimediaprosjektører
pl: Projektory multimedialne
pt: Projetores de multimídia
ru: Мультимедийные проекторы
sv: Multimediaprojektorer
tr: Multimedya Projeksiyon Cihazları

en: Overhead Projectors
xx: Overhead Projectors
cs: Dataprojektory
da: Overheadprojektorer
de: Overhead-Projektoren
es: Retroproyectores
fr: Rétroprojecteurs
it: Proiettori per lucidi
ja: OHP
nl: Overheadprojectoren
no: Overhead-prosjektører
pl: Rzutniki pisma
pt: Retroprojetores
ru: Диапроекторы
sv: OH-projektorer
tr: Tepegözler

en: Slide Projectors
xx: Slide Projectors
cs: Projektory pro prezentace
da: Diasprojektorer
de: Diaprojektoren
es: Proyectores de diapositivas
fr: Projecteurs de diapositives
it: Proiettori di diapositive
ja: スライドプロジェクター
nl: Diaprojectoren
no: Lysbildefremvisere
pl: Rzutniki przezroczy
pt: Projetores de slide
ru: Слайд-проекторы
sv: Diabildsprojektorer
tr: Slayt Makineleri

en: Satellite & Cable TV
xx: Satellite & Cable TV
cs: Satelitní a kabelové televize
da: Satellit- og kabel-tv
de: Satelliten- & Kabelfernsehen
es: Televisión por cable y satélite
fr: Télévision par câble et par satellite
it: TV satellitare e via cavo
ja: 衛星放送・ケーブルテレビ
nl: Satelliet- en kabel-TV
no: Satellitt- og kabel-TV
pl: Telewizja satelitarna i kablowa
pt: Satélite e TV a cabo
ru: Товары для спутникового и кабельного телевидения
sv: Satellit- och kabel-TV
tr: Uydu ve Kablo TV

en: Cable TV Receivers
xx: Cable TV Receivers
cs: Přijímače kabelových televizí
da: Kabel-tv-modtagere
de: Kabelfernsehen-Receiver
es: Receptores de televisión por cable
fr: Récepteurs de télévision par câble
it: Ricevitori TV via cavo
ja: ケーブルテレビチューナー
nl: Ontvangers voor kabel-tv
no: Kabel-TV-mottakere
pl: Odbiorniki telewizji kablowej
pt: Receptores de TV a cabo
ru: Приёмники кабельного телевидения
sv: Kabel-TV-mottagare
tr: Kablo TV Alıcıları

en: Satellite Receivers
xx: Satellite Receivers
cs: Satelitní přijímače
da: Satellitmodtagere
de: Satelliten-Receiver
es: Receptores satélite
fr: Récepteurs de télévision par satellite
it: Ricevitori satellitari
ja: 衛星放送チューナー
nl: Satellietontvangers
no: Satellittmottakere
pl: Odbiorniki telewizji satelitarnej
pt: Receptores de satélite
ru: Приемники спутникового телевидения
sv: Satellitmottagare
tr: Uydu Alıcılar

en: Televisions, TVs
xx: Televisions
cs: Televize
da: Tv
de: Fernseher
es: Televisores
fr: Téléviseurs, Télévision, TVs, TV
it: Televisori
ja: テレビ
nl: Televisies
no: TV-apparater
pl: Telewizory
pt: Televisões
ru: Телевизоры
sv: TV-apparater
tr: Televizyonlar

en: Video Accessories
xx: Video Accessories
cs: Videopříslušenství
da: Video – tilbehør
de: Videozubehör
es: Accesorios de vídeo
fr: Accessoires vidéo
it: Accessori video
ja: 映像機器関連用品
nl: Videoaccessoires
no: Videotilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wideo
pt: Acessórios para vídeo
ru: Принадлежности для видеоустройств
sv: Videotillbehör
tr: Video Aksesuarları

en: 3D Glasses
xx: 3D Glasses
cs: 3D brýle
da: 3D-briller
de: 3D-Brillen
es: Gafas 3D
fr: Lunettes 3D
it: Occhiali 3D
ja: 3D眼鏡
nl: 3D-brillen
no: 3D-briller
pl: Okulary 3D
pt: Óculos 3D
ru: 3D-очки
sv: 3D-glasögon
tr: 3B Gözlükler

en: Computer Monitor Accessories
xx: Computer Monitor Accessories
cs: Počítačové monitory – příslušenství
da: Computerskærm – tilbehør
de: Computerbildschirmzubehör
es: Accesorios para monitores de ordenador
fr: Accessoires pour écrans d'ordinateur
it: Accessori monitor computer
ja: PCモニター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor computerbeeldschermen
no: Tilbehør til dataskjermer
pl: Akcesoria do monitorów komputerowych
pt: Acessórios para monitor de computador
ru: Принадлежности для компьютерных мониторов
sv: Tillbehör till datorskärmar
tr: Bilgisayar Monitörü Aksesuarları

en: Color Calibrators
xx: Color Calibrators
cs: Kalibrační sondy
da: Farvekalibrering
de: Farbkalibrierung
es: Calibradores de color
fr: Kits de calibrage des couleurs
it: Calibratori colore
ja: カラーキャリブレーター
nl: Kleurmeters
no: Fargekalibreringsverktøy
pl: Kalibratory kolorów
pt: Calibradores de cor
ru: Калибровщики цвета
sv: Färgkalibratorer
tr: Renk Kalibrasyon Cihazları

en: Projector Accessories
xx: Projector Accessories
cs: Projektory – příslušenství
da: Projektor – tilbehør
de: Projektorzubehör
es: Accesorios para proyectores
fr: Accessoires pour projecteurs
it: Accessori per proiettori
ja: プロジェクター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor projectoren
no: Prosjektørtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do projektorów
pt: Acessórios para projetor
ru: Принадлежности для проекторов
sv: Projektortillbehör
tr: Projeksiyon Cihazı Aksesuarları